en: Hydro-alcoholic gels, alcohol-based gels
ar: جل كحولي مائي
az: Hidro-spirtli gellər
bg: Хидроалкохолни гелове
cs: Hydroalkoholické gely
da: Hydroalkoholiske geler
de: Hydroalkoholische Gele
el: Υδροαλκοολικά ζελέ
es: Geles hidroalcohólicos
et: Hüdroalkohoolsed geelid
fa: ژل های هیدروالکلی
fi: Hydroalkoholiset geelit
fr: Gels hydro-alcooliques, Solutions hydro-alcooliques
ga: Gels hiodrálacha-alcólacha
hr: Hidroalkoholni gelovi
hu: Hidroalkoholos gélek
hy: Հիդրոալկոհոլային գելեր
id: Gel hidro-alkohol
is: Vatnsalkóhólhlaup
it: Gel idroalcolici
ja: ハイドロアルコールジェル
ka: ჰიდროალკოჰოლური გელები
kk: Гидроалкогольді гельдер
ko: 하이드로 알코올 젤
ky: Гидроалкоголдук гелдер
lt: Hidroalkoholiniai geliai
lv: Hidroalkoholiskie geli
mk: Хидроалкохолни гелови
ms: Gel hidro-alkohol
mt: Ġellijiet idro-alkoħoliċi
nl: Hydroalcoholische gels
no: Hydro-alkoholiske geler
pl: Żele hydroalkoholowe
pt: Géis hidroalcoólicos
ro: Geluri hidroalcoolice
ru: Гидроспиртовые гели
sk: Hydroalkoholické gély
sl: Hidroalkoholni geli
sq: Xhel hidroalkoolike
sr: Хидроалкохолни гелови
sv: Hydroalkoholiska geler
sw: Geli za hidro-alkoholi
tg: Гелҳои гидроалкохолӣ
th: เจลล้างมือแอลกอฮอล์
tk: Gidroalkogolly geller
tr: Hidro-alkolik jeller
uk: Гідроспиртові гелі
uz: Gidroalkogolli gellar
vi: Gel hydro-alcoholic
zh: гидро спиртовые гели

en: Showers and baths
ar: الاستحمام والاستحمام
az: Duşlar və hamamlar
bg: Душове и вани
cs: Sprchy a koupele
da: Brusere og bade
de: Duschen und Bäder
el: Ντους και μπάνια
es: Duchas y baños
et: Dušid ja vannid
fa: دوش و حمام
fi: Suihkut ja kylvyt
fr: Douches et bains
ga: Cithfholcadáin agus folcadáin
hr: Tuševi i kupke
hu: Zuhanyzók és fürdők
hy: Ցնցուղներ և լոգարաններ
id: Pancuran dan bak mandi
is: Sturtur og böð
it: Docce e bagni
ja: シャワーと風呂
ka: შხაპები და აბაზანები
kk: Душтар мен ванналар
ko: 샤워와 목욕
ky: Душтар жана ванналар
lt: Dušai ir vonios
lv: Dušas un vannas
mk: Тушеви и бањи
ms: Mandi dan bilik mandi
mt: Doċoċ u banjijiet
nl: Douches en baden
no: Dusjer og bad
pl: Prysznice i kąpiele
pt: Chuveiros e banhos
ro: Dușuri și băi
ru: Душ и ванны
sk: Sprchy a kúpele
sl: Prtlje in kopeli
sq: Dush dhe banjot
sr: Тушеви и купељи
sv: Duschar och bad
sw: Maji na bafu
tg: Душҳо ва ваннаҳо
th: ห้องอาบน้ำและอ่างอาบน้ำ
tk: Duşlar we wannalar
tr: Duşlar ve banyolar
uk: Душі та ванни
uz: Dushlar va vannalar
vi: Vòi hoa sen và bồn tắm
zh: 淋浴和浴缸

en: Bubble baths, foaming baths
ar: حمامات الفقاعات ، حمامات الرغوة
az: Köpüklü vannalar
bg: Вани с пяна
bn: বাবল বাথ, ফোমিং বাথ
ca: Banys d'escuma
cs: Pěnové koupele
da: Boblebade, skumbade
de: Schaumbäder
el: Αφρόλουτρα
es: Baños de burbujas, baños de espuma
et: Mullivannid, vahuvannid
fa: حمام حباب، حمام کف کننده
fi: Vaahtokylvyt
fr: Bains moussants, Bain moussant, Bains moussant
ga: Folcadáin mboilgeog, folcadáin cúr
he: אמבטיות בועות, אמבטיות קצף
hr: Kupke s mjehurićima, kupke za pjenjenje
hu: Habfürdők
hy: Փրփուրով լոգանքներ
id: Mandi busa
is: Froðuböð
it: Bagni di schiuma
ja: 泡風呂
ka: აბაზანები ბუშტებით
kk: Көпіршікті ванналар
km: ងូតទឹកពពុះ, ងូតទឹកមានពពុះ
ko: 거품 목욕
ky: Көбүктүү ванналар
lt: Putų vonios
lv: Burbuļvannas
mk: Кади со пена
ms: Mandian buih
mt: Banjijiet tal-bżieżaq, banjijiet tal-fowm
nl: Schuimbaden
no: Boblebad, skumbad
pl: Kąpiele w pianie
pt: Banhos de espuma
ro: Băi cu spumă
ru: Пенные ванны
sk: Penové kúpele
sl: Kopeli z mehurčki
sq: Banjo me flluska
sr: Купке са мехурићима
sv: Bubbelbad, skumbad
sw: Bafu za Bubble, bafu za povu
tg: Ваннаҳои ҳубобӣ
th: อ่างอาบน้ำฟอง
tk: Köpükli wannalar
tr: Köpük banyoları
uk: Ванни з піною
ur: بلبلا غسل، جھاگ والا غسل
uz: Ko'pikli vannalar
vi: Bồn tắm bong bóng
zh: 泡泡浴

en: Bath salts
ar: أملاح الاستحمام
az: Vanna duzları
bg: Соли за вана
bn: বাথ সল্ট
ca: Sals de bany
cs: Koupelové soli
da: Badesalte
de: Badesalze
el: Άλατα μπάνιου
es: Sales de baño
et: Vannisoolad
fa: نمک حمام
fi: Kylpysuolat
fr: Sels de bain
ga: Salainn folctha
he: מלחי אמבט
hr: Sol za kupanje
hu: Fürdősók
hy: Լոգանքի աղեր
id: Garam mandi
is: Baðsölt
it: Sali da bagno
ja: バスソルト
ka: აბაზანის მარილები
kk: Ваннаға арналған тұздар
km: អំបិលងូតទឹក
ko: 입욕제
ky: Ванна үчүн туздар
lt: Vonios druskos
lv: Vannas sāļi
mk: Соли за капење
ms: Garam mandian
mt: Mlieħ tal-banju
nl: Badzouten
no: Badesalter
pl: Sole do kąpieli
pt: Sais de banho
ro: Săruri de baie
ru: Соли для ванн
sk: Kúpeľové soli
sl: Soli za kopel
sq: Kripëra banjo
sr: Соли за купатило
sv: Bad salt
sw: Chumvi za kuoga
tg: Намакҳои ванна
th: เกลือแช่ตัว
tk: Wanna duzlary
tr: Banyo tuzları
uk: Сіль для ванн
ur: نہانے کے نمکیات
uz: Vanna tuzlari
vi: Muối tắm
zh: 浴盐

en: Shower gels
de: Duschgele, Duschgels
es: Geles de ducha, Gel de ducha
fr: Gels douche, Gel douche
it: Gel doccia, Bagnoschiuma
nl: Douchegel, douchegels
pt: Gel de banho, Géis de banho

en: Shower creams, Cream shower gels
de: Duschcremes, Creme-Duschgels
es: Cremas de ducha, Geles de ducha en crema
fr: Crèmes douche, Douche crème
it: Docciaschiuma in crema, Creme doccia
nl: Douchecrèmes
pt: Cremes de banho, Géis de banho em creme

en: Shower oils
fr: Huiles douche

en: Intimate hygiene
ar: نظافة شخصية
az: Intim gigiyena
bg: Интимна хигиена
cs: Intimní hygiena
da: Intimhygiejne
de: Intimhygiene
el: Προσωπική υγιεινή
es: Higiene íntima
et: Intiimhügieen
fa: بهداشت شخصی
fi: Intiimihygienia
fr: Hygiène intime
ga: Sláinteachas pearsanta
hr: Intimna higijena
hu: Intimhigiénia
hy: Անձնական հիգիենա
id: Kebersihan pribadi
is: Nærfatahygía
it: Igiene intima
ja: パーソナル衛生
ka: პირადი ჰიგიენა
kk: Жеке гигиена
ko: 개인 위생
ky: Жеке гигиена
lt: Intymi higiena
lv: Intīmā higiēna
mk: Интимна хигиена
ms: Kebersihan diri
mt: Iġjene intima
nl: Intieme hygiëne
no: Intimhygiene
pl: Higiena intymna
pt: Higiene íntima
ro: Igiena intimă
ru: Интимная гигиена
sk: Intímna hygiena
sl: Intimna higiena
sq: Higjiena intime
sr: Интимна хигијена
sv: Intimhygien
sw: Usafi binafsi
tg: Гигиенаи шахсӣ
th: สุขอนามัยส่วนบุคคล
tk: Şahsy gigiýena
tr: Kişisel hijyen
uk: Інтимна гігієна
uz: Shaxsiy gigiena
vi: Vệ sinh cá nhân
zh: 个人卫生

en: Tampons
ar: سدادات قطنية
az: Tamponlar
bg: Тампони
bn: ট্যাম্পন
ca: Tampons
cs: Tampony
da: Tamponer
de: Tampons
el: Ταμπόν
es: Tampón higiénico
et: Tamponid
fa: تامپون
fi: Tamponit
fr: Tampons hygiéniques, Tampons
ga: Tamponí
he: טמפונים
hr: Tamponi
hu: Tamponok
hy: Տամպոններ
id: Tampon
is: Tamponar
it: Tamponi
ja: タンポン
ka: ტამპონები
kk: Тампондар
km: tampons
ko: 탐폰
ky: Тампондор
lt: Tamponai
lv: Tamponi
mk: Тампони
ms: Tampon
mt: Tampons
nl: Tampons
no: Tamponer
pl: Tampony
pt: Tampões
ro: Tampoane
ru: Тампоны
sk: Tampóny
sl: Tamponi
sq: Tamponë
sr: Тампони
sv: Tamponger
sw: Tamponi
tg: Тампонҳо
th: ผ้าอนามัยแบบสอด
tk: Tamponlar
tr: Tamponlar
uk: Тампони
ur: ٹیمپون
uz: Tamponlar
vi: Tampon
zh: 卫生棉条

en: Regular tampons
de: Normale Tampons
es: Tampones regulares
fr: Tampons réguliers
it: Assorbenti interni regolari, Tamponi regolari
nl: Normale tampons
pt: Tampões regulares, Absorventes internos regulares

en: Intimate wash gels
ar: جل غسول للمناطق الحساسة
az: Intim gigiyena üçün gellər
bg: Интимни душ гелове
bn: অন্তরঙ্গ ধোয়ার জেল
ca: Gels per a la higiene íntima
cs: Intimní mycí gely
da: Intimvaskegel
de: Intimwaschgele
el: Ζελ για την ευαίσθητη περιοχή
es: Geles para la higiene íntima
et: Intiimpesugeelid
fa: ژل شستشوی بهداشتی
fi: Intiimipesugeelit
fr: Gels pour la toilette intime
ga: Gels nigh intí
he: ג'ל לשטיפה אינטימית
hr: Gelovi za intimnu njegu
hu: Intim mosakodó gélek
hy: Ինտիմ հիգիենայի գելեր
id: Gel pembersih area intim
is: Intimþvottahlaup
it: Gel per l'igiene intima
ja: デリケートゾーン用ウォッシュジェル
ka: ინტიმური დაბანის გელები
kk: Интимдік гигиенаға арналған гельдер
km: ជែលលាងសម្អាតសំរាប់តំបន់សំងាត់
ko: 여성 청결제
ky: Интимдик гигиена үчүн гельдер
lt: Intymios higienos prausikliai
lv: Intīmās higiēnas želejas
mk: Гелови за интимна хигиена
ms: Gel cucian intim
mt: Ġellijiet tal-ħasil intimi
nl: Intieme wasgels
no: Intimvaskegeler
pl: Żele do higieny intymnej
pt: Géis para a higiene íntima
ro: Geluri pentru igiena intimă
ru: Гели для интимной гигиены
sk: Intímne umývacie gély
sl: Geli za intimno umivanje
sq: Xhel për larje intime
sr: Гелови за интимну хигијену
sv: Intimtvättsgel
sw: Jeli za kuogea sehemu za siri
tg: Гелҳо барои гигиенаи маҳрамона
th: เจลทำความสะอาดจุดซ่อนเร้น
tk: Intim gigiýena üçin geller
tr: İntim yıkama jelleri
uk: Гелі для інтимної гігієни
ur: انٹی میٹ واش جیل
uz: Intim gigiyena uchun gellar
vi: Gel rửa vệ sinh phụ nữ
zh: 私处洗液

en: Deodorants
ar: مزيلات العرق
az: Deodorantlar
bg: Дезодоранти
bn: ডিওডোরেন্ট
ca: Desodorants
cs: Deodoranty
da: Deodoranter
de: Deodorante, Deodorants, Deo
el: Αποσμητικά
es: Desodorantes
et: Deodorandid
fa: دئودورانت
fi: Deodorantit
fr: Déodorants, Déos, Déo
ga: Díbholaí
he: דאודורנטים
hr: Dezodoransi
hu: Dezodorok
hy: Դեզոդորանտներ
id: Deodoran
is: Svitalyktareyðar
it: Deodoranti
ja: デオドラント
ka: დეზოდორანტები
kk: Дезодоранттар
km: ផលិតផល​កម្ចាត់​ក្លិន
ko: 데오도란트
ky: Дезодоранттар
lt: Dezodorantai
lv: Dezodoranti
mk: Дезодоранси
ms: Deodoran
mt: Deodoranti
nl: Deodorant, deodorants, deo
no: Deodoranter
pl: Dezodoranty
pt: Desodorizantes
ro: Deodorante
ru: Дезодоранты
sk: Deodoranty
sl: Dezodoranti
sq: Deodorantët
sr: Дезодоранси
sv: Deodoranter
sw: Deodorant
tg: Дезодорантҳо
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์ระงับกลิ่นกาย
tk: Dezodorantlar
tr: Deodorantlar
uk: Дезодоранти
ur: ڈیوڈورینٹ
uz: Dezodorantlar
vi: Chất khử mùi
zh: 除臭剂

en: Anti-perspirants
ar: مضادات التعرق
az: Terləməyə qarşı vasitələr
bg: Антиперспиранти
bn: অ্যান্টি-পারস্পিরেন্ট
ca: Antitranspirants
cs: Antiperspiranty
da: Antiperspiranter
de: Antitranspirante
el: Αντιιδρωτικά
es: Antitranspirantes
et: Antiperspirandid
fa: ضد تعریق
fi: Antiperspirantit
fr: Déodorants anti-transpirants, Déodorant anti-transpirant, Anti-transpirant
ga: Frithbhealaí
he: אנטי-פרספירנטים
hr: Antiperspiranti
hu: Izzadásgátlók
hy: Հակաքրտնագեղձեր
id: Anti-perspiran
is: Andsvörunarefni
it: Antitraspiranti
ja: 制汗剤
ka: ანტიპერსპირანტები
kk: Терге қарсы заттар
km: ថ្នាំបំបាត់ញើស
ko: 땀 억제제
ky: Терге каршы каражаттар
lt: Antiperspirantai
lv: Antiperspiranti
mk: Антиперспиранти
ms: Anti-perspirant
mt: Antiprespiranti
nl: Anti-transpiranten
no: Antiperspiranter
pl: Antyperspiranty
pt: Antitranspirantes
ro: Antiperspirante
ru: Антиперспиранты
sk: Antiperspiranty
sl: Antiperspiranti
sq: Antiperspirantët
sr: Антиперспиранти
sv: Antiperspiranter
sw: Vizuia jasho
tg: Антиперспирантҳо
th: สารระงับเหงื่อ
tk: Derlemek garşy serişdeler
tr: Ter önleyiciler
uk: Антиперспіранти
ur: اینٹی پرسپیرنٹ
uz: Terlashga qarshi vositalar
vi: Chất chống mồ hôi
zh: 止汗剂

en: Foot deodorants, Foot deodorant
ar: مزيلات العرق للقدمين
az: Ayaq deodorantları
bg: Дезодоранти за крака
bn: পায়ের ডিওডোরেন্ট
ca: Desodorants per als peus
cs: Deodoranty na nohy
da: Fod deodoranter
de: Fußdeodorants
el: Αποσμητικά ποδιών
es: Desodorantes para pies
et: Jalgade deodorandid
fa: دئودورانت پا
fi: Jalkadeodorantit
fr: Déodorants pieds, Déodorant pied
ga: Díbholaí coise
he: דאודורנטים לרגליים
hr: Dezodoransi za stopala
hu: Lábdezodorok
hy: Ոտքերի դեզոդորանտներ
id: Deodoran kaki
is: Fótadeodorant
it: Deodoranti per piedi
ja: 足用消臭剤
ka: ფეხის დეზოდორანტები
kk: Аяққа арналған дезодоранттар
km: ផលិតផល​កម្ចាត់​ក្លិន​ជើង
ko: 발 데오도란트
ky: Бут үчүн дезодоранттар
lt: Kojų dezodorantai
lv: Kāju dezodoranti
mk: Дезодоранси за нозе
ms: Deodoran kaki
mt: Deodoranti tas-saqajn
nl: Voetdeodorants
no: Fotdeodoranter
pl: Dezodoranty do stóp
pt: Desodorizantes para pés
ro: Deodorante pentru picioare
ru: Дезодоранты для ног
sk: Dezodoranty na nohy
sl: Dezodoranti za noge
sq: Deodorantë për këmbët
sr: Дезодоранси за стопала
sv: Fotdeodoranter
sw: Deodorant za miguu
tg: Дезодорантҳои пой
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์ระงับกลิ่นเท้า
tk: Aýak üçin dezodorantlar
tr: Ayak deodorantları
uk: Дезодоранти для ніг
ur: پاؤں کے ڈیوڈورنٹ
uz: Oyoq uchun dezodorantlar
vi: Chất khử mùi cho chân
zh: 足部除臭剂

en: Deodorants sticks, Deodorant stick
ar: مزيلات العرق الصلبة
az: Bərk dezodorantlar
bg: Дезодоранти стик
bn: ডিওডোরেন্ট স্টিক
ca: Desodorants en barra
cs: Tuhé deodoranty
da: Deodorant sticks
de: Deodorant-Sticks
el: Αποσμητικά στικ
es: Desodorantes en barra
et: Deodorantpulgad
fa: استیک های دئودورانت
fi: Deodoranttistickit
fr: Déodorants sticks, Déodorant stick
ga: Bataí díbholaí
he: סטיקים של דאודורנט
hr: Dezodoransi u stiku
hu: Stift dezodorok
hy: Դեզոդորանտներ ստիկներ
id: Deodoran stik
is: Svitalyktareyðarstifti
it: Deodoranti stick
ja: デオドラントスティック
ka: დეზოდორანტის ჩხირები
kk: Дезодорант таяқшалары
km: ដុំ​លាប​ក្លៀក
ko: 데오도란트 스틱
ky: Дезодорант таякчалары
lt: Dezodorantų pieštukai
lv: Dezodorantu zīmuļi
mk: Дезодоранси во стик
ms: Deodoran batang
mt: Stikek tad-deodorant
nl: Deodorant sticks
no: Deodorant-stifter
pl: Dezodoranty w sztyfcie
pt: Desodorizantes em stick
ro: Deodorante stick
ru: Твердые дезодоранты
sk: Tuhé dezodoranty
sl: Dezodoranti v stiku
sq: Deodorantë shkop
sr: Дезодоранси у стику
sv: Deodorant-stick
sw: Vijiti vya deodorant
tg: Дезодорантҳои сахт
th: สติ๊กระงับกลิ่นกาย
tk: Gaty dezodorantlar
tr: Stick deodorantlar
uk: Тверді дезодоранти
ur: ڈیوڈورنٹ اسٹکس
uz: Qattiq dezodorantlar
zh: 除臭棒

en: Roll-on deodorants
ar: مزيلات العرق الدوارة
az: Roll-on dezodorantlar
bg: Рол-он дезодоранти
cs: Kuličkové deodoranty
da: Roll-on deodoranter
de: Roll-on Deodorants, Roll-on Deos
el: Αποσμητικά roll-on
es: Desodorantes roll-on
et: Rull-deodorandid
fa: دئودورانت رولی
fi: Roll-on-deodorantit
fr: Déodorants bille, Déodorant bille
ga: Díbhollaí rollta
hr: Roll-on dezodoransi
hu: Golyós dezodorok
hy: Գլանափաթեթավոր դեզոդորանտներ
id: Deodoran roll-on
is: Rúllandi svitalyktareyðir
it: Deodoranti roll-on
ja: ロールオンデオドラント
ka: როლიკებიანი დეზოდორანტები
kk: Шарикті дезодоранттар
ko: 롤온 데오도란트
ky: Ролик дезодоранттар
lt: Rutuliniai dezodorantai
lv: Rullīšu dezodoranti
mk: Рол-он дезодоранси
ms: Deodoran roll-on
mt: Deodoranti roll-on
nl: Roldeodorants
no: Roll-on deodoranter
pl: Dezodoranty w kulce
pt: Desodorizantes roll-on
ro: Deodorante roll-on
ru: Шариковые дезодоранты
sk: Guľôčkové dezodoranty
sl: Roll-on dezodoranti
sq: Deodorantë roll-on
sr: Roll-on dezodoransi
sv: Roll-on deodoranter
sw: Deodorant za kusugua
tg: Дезодорантҳои роликӣ
th: โรลออนระงับกลิ่นกาย
tk: Roликli dezodorantlar
tr: Roll-on deodorantlar
uk: Кулькові дезодоранти
uz: Rolikli dezodorantlar
zh: 滚珠除臭剂

en: Deodorant with Alum stone
ar: مزيل عرق بحجر الشب
az: Əlvan daşı ilə dezodorant
bg: Дезодорант с алуминиев камък
cs: Deodorant s kamencem
da: Deodorant med alunsten
de: Deodorant mit Alaunstein
el: Αποσμητικό με πέτρα στυπτηρίας
es: Desodorante con piedra de alumbre
et: Deodorant alumiiniumkiviga
fa: دئودورانت با سنگ آلومینیوم
fi: Deodorantti alunakivellä
fr: Déodorant à la pierre d'Alun
ga: Díbholaí le cloch Alum
hr: Dezodorans s kamenom
hu: Dezodor alunitkővel
hy: Ալյումինե քարով դեզոդորանտ
id: Deodoran dengan batu alum
is: Svitalyktareyðir með alunsteini
it: Deodorante con pietra di allume
ja: ミョウバン石デオドラント
ka: დედორანტი ალუმინის ქვით
kk: Ашудас тасы бар дезодорант
ko: 명반석 데오도란트
ky: Алюмокалиевые квасцы ташы бар дезодорант
lt: Dezodorantas su alūno akmeniu
lv: Dezodorants ar alauna akmeni
mk: Дезодоранс со камен од стипса
ms: Deodoran dengan batu tawas
mt: Deodorant bil-ġebla Alum
nl: Deodorant met aluinsteen
no: Deodorant med alunstein
pl: Dezodorant z ałunem
pt: Desodorizante com pedra de alúmen
ro: Deodorant cu piatră de alaun
ru: Дезодорант с квасцовым камнем
sk: Deodorant s kamencom
sl: Dezodorant z alunitom
sq: Deodorant me gur alum
sr: Dezodorans sa kamenom
sv: Deodorant med alunsten
sw: Deodorant yenye jiwe la Alum
tg: Дезодорант бо санги алуминӣ
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์ระงับกลิ่นกายที่มีสารส้ม
tk: Alýum daşly dezodorant
tr: Şap taşı içeren deodorant
uk: Дезодорант з галуном
uz: Alyum toshli dezodorant
vi: Chất khử mùi với đá phèn
zh: 明矾石除臭剂

en: Hair removal, Depilation
ar: إزالة الشعر
az: Tüklərin təmizlənməsi
bg: Обезкосмяване, Депилация
bn: চুল অপসারণ, Depilation
ca: Depilació
cs: Odstraňování chloupků, Depilace
da: Hårfjerning, Depilation
de: Haarentfernung, Enthaarung
el: Αποτρίχωση
es: Depilación
et: Karvade eemaldamine
fa: رفع مو، دپیلاسیون
fi: Karvanpoisto
fr: Épilation
ga: Baint gruaige
he: הסרת שיער
hr: Uklanjanje dlaka, Depilacija
hu: Szőrtelenítés
hy: Մազահեռացում
id: Penghilangan rambut
is: Hárfelling
it: Depilazione
ja: 脱毛
ka: თმის მოცილება
kk: Шаш алу
km: ការដកសក់
ko: 제모
ky: Түктөрдү тазалоо
lt: Plaukų šalinimas
lv: Apmatojuma likvidēšana
mk: Отстранување на влакна
ms: Penyingkiran rambut
mt: Tneħħija tax-xagħar
nl: Ontharing
no: Hårfjerning
pl: Depilacja
pt: Depilação
ro: Epilare
ru: Удаление волос
sk: Odstraňovanie chĺpkov
sl: Odstranjevanje dlak
sq: Heqja e qimeve
sr: Уклањање длака
sv: Hårborttagning
sw: Uondoaji wa nywele
tg: Мӯйҳои барзиёд
th: การกำจัดขน
tk: Tüýleri aýyrmak
tr: Epilasyon
uk: Видалення волосся
ur: بالوں کو ہٹانا
uz: Soch olib tashlash
vi: Tẩy lông
zh: 脱毛

en: Bleaching gels
ar: جل تبييض الشعر
az: Rəngsizləşdirici gellər
bg: Избелващи гелове
bn: চুল অপসারণ জেল
ca: Gels decolorants
cs: Odbarvovací gely
da: Afblegningsgeler
de: Bleichgele
el: Ζελέ αποχρωματισμού
es: Geles decolorantes
et: Pleegitusgeelid
fa: ژل های سفید کننده مو
fi: Värinpoistogeelit
fr: Gels décolorants, gel décolorant
ga: Gels tuaradh
he: ג'ל להבהרת שיער
hr: Gelovi za izbjeljivanje kose
hu: Szőkítő gélek
hy: Մազերի գունաթափման գելեր
id: Gel pemutih rambut
is: Bleikigel
it: Gel decoloranti
ja: 髪の漂白ジェル
ka: მათეთრებელი გელები
kk: Ағартқыш гельдер
km: ជែលលុបបំបាត់សក់
ko: 탈색 젤
ky: Агартуучу гельдер
lt: Balinimo geliai
lv: Balināšanas želejas
mk: Гелови за белење на коса
ms: Gel peluntur rambut
mt: Ġellijiet li jbajdu x-xagħar
nl: Bleekgels
no: Bleikegeler
pl: Żele rozjaśniające
pt: Géis descolorantes
ro: Geluri decolorante
ru: Обесцвечивающие гели
sk: Odfarbovacie gély
sl: Geli za beljenje las
sq: Xhel zbardhues
sr: Гелови за избељивање косе
sv: Blekmedel
sw: Geli za bleach
tg: Гелҳои сафедкунандаи мӯй
th: เจลฟอกสีผม
tk: Reňksizlendiriji geller
tr: Saç açıcı jeller
uk: Гелі для знебарвлення волосся
ur: بلیچنگ جیل
uz: Oqartiruvchi gellar
vi: Gel tẩy tóc
zh: 漂白凝胶

en: Post-epilation lotion
ar: غسول بعد إزالة الشعر
az: Epilyasiyadan sonra losyon
bg: Лосион след епилация
cs: Pleťová voda po depilaci
da: Lotion efter hårfjerning
de: Lotion nach der Haarentfernung
el: Λοσιόν μετά την αποτρίχωση
es: Loción para después de la depilación
et: Losjoon pärast depilatsiooni
fa: لوسیون بعد از اپیلاسیون
fi: Ihonpoiston jälkeinen lotion
fr: Lotion post-épilation
ga: Lóis tar éis epilation
hr: Losion poslije depilacije
hu: Epilálás utáni testápoló
hy: Մազահեռացումից հետո լոսյոն
id: Losion setelah epilasi
is: Rakstur eftir háreyðingu
it: Lozione post-epilazione
ja: 脱毛後ローション
ka: ეპილაციის შემდგომი ლოსიონი
kk: Эпиляциядан кейінгі лосьон
ko: 제모 후 로션
ky: Эпиляциядан кийинки лосьон
lt: Losjonas po depiliacijos
lv: Losjons pēc epilācijas
mk: Лосион после депилација
ms: Losen selepas epilasi
mt: Lozjoni wara l-epilazzjoni
nl: Lotion na het ontharen
no: Lotion etter hårfjerning
pl: Balsam po depilacji
pt: Loção pós-depilação
ro: Loțiune după epilare
ru: Лосьон после эпиляции
sk: Pleťová voda po depilácii
sl: Losjon po depilaciji
sq: Losion pas depilimit
sr: Лосион после депилације
sv: Lotion efter epilering
sw: Losheni baada ya kuondoa nywele
tg: Лосьон пас аз эпиляция
th: โลชั่นหลังการกำจัดขน
tk: Epilýasiýadan soň losýon
tr: Epilasyon sonrası losyon
uk: Лосьйон після епіляції
uz: Epilasyondan keyin loson
vi: Sữa dưỡng thể sau tẩy lông
zh: 脱毛后乳液